California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(c) Any person who maliciously and intentionally maims, mutilates, or physically tortures any fish, reptile, bird, amphibian, or mammal provided for in this code is guilty of a crime punishable in accordance with subdivision (a). Nothing in this subdivision affects any legal activity pursuant to this code, including, but not limited to, hunting, fishing, trapping, hunting dog training, hunting dog field trials, predation control, and efforts to dispatch a wounded mammal, bird, or fish taken legally.

(d) Nothing in this section prohibits a person from giving, receiving, or possessing the legal possession limit of lawfully taken fish, reptiles, birds, amphibians, or mammals.

(e) Nothing in this section prohibits a person from giving,
 receiving, or possessing, at the personal abode of the donor or donee, lawfully taken migratory game birds that are not required to be tagged pursuant to the federal Migratory Bird Treaty Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 703 et seq.) or regulations adopted pursuant to that act.

(f) This section does not supersede Section 12005, 12006.6, or 12009.

(g) Moneys equivalent to 50 percent of the revenue from any fine collected pursuant to this section shall be paid to the county in which the offense was committed, pursuant to Section 13003. The board of supervisors shall first use revenues pursuant to this subdivision to reimburse the costs incurred by the district attorney or city attorney in investigating and prosecuting the violation. Any excess revenues may be expended in accordance with Section 13103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 70.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

12013.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 12002, 12003.2, 12008, or 12008.5, the punishment for a person who knowingly violated and has been convicted of the following provisions where the violation involved a trophy deer, elk, antelope, or bighorn sheep shall be a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000), and where the violation involved a wild turkey, a fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or both that fine and imprisonment:

(1) Section 2001, if the person took an animal outside the established season.

(2) Section 2005.

(3) Section 257.5 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(4) Section 4304.

(5) Section 4330.

(6) Section 1054.2, if the person failed to procure the required license or tag prior to taking a deer, elk, antelope, or bighorn sheep.

(b) The commission shall adopt regulations to implement this section, including establishing a trophy designation and monetary value based on the size or related characteristics of deer, elk, antelope, bighorn sheep, and wild turkeys.

(c) All revenue from fines imposed pursuant to this section for deer, elk, antelope, and bighorn sheep violations shall be
 deposited in the Big Game Management Account established in Section 3953 and shall be used for the big game management purposes described in that section.

(d) All revenue from fines imposed pursuant to this section for wild turkey violations shall be deposited in the Upland Game Bird Account established in Section 3684 and shall be used for the upland game bird conservation purposes described in that section.

(e) Moneys equivalent to 50 percent of the revenue from any fine collected pursuant to this section shall be paid to the county in which the offense was committed, pursuant to Section 13003. The county board of supervisors shall first use revenues pursuant to this subdivision to reimburse the costs incurred by the district attorney or city attorney in investigating and prosecuting the violation. Any excess revenues may be expended in accordance with Section
 13103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 107.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12013.5.

(a) In addition to any other penalties provided in this code, any person convicted of violating this code or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto while using a signal-emitting device in conjunction with the take of bear for the purpose of selling or trafficking in bear parts shall be subject to a fine of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per bear part. For purposes of this section, a “signal-emitting device” means any device capable of generating radio, cellular, satellite, or other signal transmission for purposes of providing communication or location information.

(b) All revenue from fines imposed pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Big Game Management Account established in Section
 3953 and shall be used for the big game management purposes described in that section. 

(c) Moneys equivalent to 50 percent of the revenue from any fine collected pursuant to this section shall be paid to the county in which the offense was committed, pursuant to Section 13003. The county board of supervisors shall first use revenues pursuant to this subdivision to reimburse the costs incurred by the district attorney or city attorney in investigating and prosecuting the violation. Any excess revenues may be expended in accordance with Section 13103.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 590, Sec. 4.   (AB 1162)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12014.

After the expiration of the time period to appeal an administrative penalty imposed pursuant to Section 2301, 2302, 2582, or 2583, or any other provision of this code, the department may apply to the clerk of the appropriate court for a judgment to collect the administrative civil penalty. The application, including a certified copy of the order imposing the civil penalty, a hearing officer’s decision, if any, or a settlement agreement, if any, shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant issuance of the judgment. The court clerk shall enter the judgment immediately in conformity with the application. The judgment so entered has the same force and effect as, and is subject to all the provisions of law relating to, a judgment in a civil action, and may be enforced in the same manner as any other judgment of the court in which it
 is entered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 294, Sec. 28.   (AB 1442)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

12015.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that expeditious cleanup is the primary interest of the people of the State of California in order to protect the people and the environment of the state.

(b) In addition to any other penalty, anyone responsible for polluting, contaminating, or obstructing waters of this state, or depositing or discharging materials threatening to pollute, contaminate, or obstruct waters of this state, to the detriment of fish, plant, bird, or animal life in those waters, shall be required to remove any substance placed in the waters, or to remove any material threatening to pollute, contaminate, or obstruct waters of this state, which can be removed, that caused the prohibited condition, or to pay the
 costs of the removal by the department.

(c) Prior to taking any action committing the use of state funds pursuant to this section or Section 5655, the department shall first make a reasonable effort to have the person responsible, when that person is known and readily available, remove, or agree to pay for the removal of, the substance causing the prohibited condition, if the responsible person acts expeditiously and does not cause the prohibited condition to be prolonged to the detriment of fish, plant, animal, or bird life in the affected waters. When the responsible party is unknown or is not providing adequate and timely cleanup, the emergency reserve account of the Toxic Substances Control Account in the General Fund shall be used to provide funding for the cleanup pursuant to Section 78875 of the Health and Safety Code. When those or other funds are not available, moneys in the Fish and Wildlife Pollution Account shall be available, in
 accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 12017, for funding the cleanup expenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 15.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------

12016.

(a) In addition to any other provision of law, any person who discharges or deposits any substance or material deleterious to fish, plant, bird, or animal life or their habitat into, or which threatens to enter, the waters of this state is liable civilly to the department for all actual damages to fish, plant, bird, or animal life or their habitat and, in addition, for the reasonable costs incurred in cleaning up the deleterious substance or material or abating its effects, or both.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “deleterious substance or material” does not include substances or materials otherwise expressly permitted or authorized to be deposited or discharged into waters of the state by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 864, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12017.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 13001, any recovery or settlement of money received pursuant to the following sections shall be deposited in the Fish and Wildlife Pollution Account:

(1) Section 2014.

(2) Article 1 (commencing with Section 5650) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 6.

(3) Section 12015 or 12016.

(4) Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 151) of Division 1.5 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(5) Section 13442 of the Water Code.

(6) Proceeds or recoveries from pollution and abatement actions.

(b) Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the department, except as provided in Section 13230.

(c) Funds in the account shall be expended for the following purposes:

(1) Abatement, cleanup, and removal of pollutants from the environment.

(2) Response coordination, planning, and program management.

(3) Resource injury determination.

(4) Resource damage assessment.

(5) Economic valuation of resources.

(6) Restoration or rehabilitation at sites damaged by pollution.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), funds in the account in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000) as of July 1 of each year may also be expended for the preservation of California plants, wildlife, and fisheries.

(e) Funds in the account may be expended for cleanup and abatement if a reasonable effort has been made to have the responsible party pay cleanup and abatement costs and funds are not available for disbursement from the emergency reserve account of the Toxic Substances Control Account in the General Fund pursuant to Section 78875 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) The department may use funds in the account to pay the costs of consultant contracts for resource injury
 determination or damage assessment during hazardous material or oil spill emergencies. These contracts are not subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 16) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 218.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12020.

Any person who is charged with a violation of this code or a regulation adopted pursuant to this code, who willfully violates their written promise to appear in court or before a person authorized to receive a deposit of bail is guilty of a misdemeanor regardless of the disposition of the charge upon which the person was originally arrested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 219.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12021.

(a) In addition to any assessment, fine, penalty, or forfeiture imposed pursuant to any other provision of law, an additional penalty of fifteen dollars ($15) shall be added to any fine, penalty, or forfeiture imposed under this code for a violation of this code or a regulation adopted pursuant thereto. However, no more than one such additional penalty may be imposed in a single proceeding. The revenue from this penalty shall be transferred to, and deposited in, the Fish and Game Preservation Fund and used exclusively for the purposes of Section 13006.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a violation punishable pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12002.1, subdivision (b) of Section 12002.2, or any regulation relating to the wearing or display of a fishing license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 576, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12023.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 12002 and 12007, any person who violates Section 6400 through the use of an aquatic nuisance species, as defined in Section 6431, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by all of the following:

(1) Imprisonment in the county jail for not less than six months or more than one year, a fine of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each violation, or both that imprisonment and fine.

(2) Revocation of all of the defendant’s licenses and permits issued pursuant to this code.

(b) A person who personally or through another violates Section 6400, through the use of
 an aquatic nuisance species, is liable to the owner of any privately or publicly owned property for any damages to that property caused by the violation. A person who violates Section 6400 through the use of an aquatic nuisance species shall also be liable for all monetary damages directly, indirectly, and proximately caused thereby, including, but not limited to, damages to any commercial fishery, sport fishery, or to the public communities which depend upon those fisheries for a portion of their annual income. The Attorney General may file a civil action on behalf of the fisheries or communities that are damaged as a result of the violation. In addition, a private citizen who suffers damages as a result of the violation may file a civil action against the violator.

(c) A person who allows an aquatic nuisance species to escape from their property to the property of another, whether privately or publicly owned, is liable to the owner of the
 intruded upon property for any damages caused by the species.

(d) This section shall not apply to the placement of any live fish, any fresh or salt water animal, or any aquatic plant from the discharge or exchange of ballast water from any vessel as defined by Section 21 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(e) This section does not apply to the placement of an aquatic plant by a person who was unaware that they were in possession of the plant. This exception includes circumstances in which a plant becomes unknowingly and temporarily attached or affixed to a boat, boat trailer, or boat motor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 220.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12024.

(a) In addition to Section 12023, a person who violates Section 6400 through the use of an aquatic nuisance species is liable for all public and private response, treatment, and remediation efforts resulting from the violation. The cost of these efforts shall constitute a debt of that person, and shall be collectible by the federal, state, county, public agency, or private individual or individuals, incurring those costs in the same manner as in the case of an obligation under a contract, expressed or implied.

(b) Public agencies participating in a response to a violation of Section 6400 through the use of an aquatic nuisance species may designate one or more of the participating agencies to bring an action to recover costs incurred by all of the participating agencies.

(c) The costs relating to an accounting for a violation of Section 6400 through the use of an aquatic nuisance species and the collection of any funds, including, but not limited to, the administrative, legal, and public relations costs of operating a response and remediation program may also be the subject of an action to recover costs which are charged against the responsible person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 431, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

12025.

(a) In addition to any penalties imposed by any other law, a person found to have violated the code sections described in paragraphs (1) to (11), inclusive, in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products on land under the management of the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, the State Lands Commission, a regional park district, the United States Forest Service, or the United States Bureau of Land Management, or within the respective ownership of a timberland production zone, as defined in Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 51100) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code, of more than 50,000 acres, or while trespassing on other public or private land in connection with the production or
 cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products, shall be liable for a civil penalty as follows:

(1) A person who violates Section 1602 in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

(2) A person who violates Section 5650 in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000) for each violation.

(3) A person who violates Section 5652 in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000) for each violation.

(4) A
 person who violates subdivision (a) of Section 374.3 of the Penal Code in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000) for each violation.

(5) A person who violates paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 374.3 of the Penal Code in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000) for each violation.

(6) A person who violates subdivision (b) of Section 374.8 of the Penal Code in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000) for each violation.

(7) A person who violates Section 384a
 of the Penal Code in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

(8) A person who violates subdivision (a) of Section 4571 of the Public Resources Code in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

(9) A person who violates Section 4581 of the Public Resources Code in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

(10) A person who violates Section 2000 in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis
 products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

(11) A person who violates Section 2002 in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

(b) (1) In addition to any penalties imposed by any other law, a person found to have violated the code sections described in this subdivision in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products on land that the person owns, leases, or otherwise uses or occupies with the consent of the landowner shall be liable for a civil penalty as follows:

(A) A person who violates Section 1602 in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or
 cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than eight thousand dollars ($8,000) for each violation.

(B) A person who violates Section 5650 in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each violation.

(C) A person who violates Section 5652 in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each violation.

(D) A person who violates subdivision (a) of Section 374.3 of the Penal Code in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each violation.

(E) A person who violates paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 374.3 of the Penal Code in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each violation.

(F) A person who violates subdivision (b) of Section 374.8 of the Penal Code in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each violation.

(G) A person who violates Section 384a of the Penal Code in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

(H) A person who violates subdivision (a) of Section 4571 of the Public Resources Code in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than eight thousand dollars ($8,000) for each violation.

(I) A person who violates Section 4581 of the Public Resources Code in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than eight thousand dollars ($8,000) for each violation.

(J) A person who violates Section 2000 in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than eight thousand dollars ($8,000) for each violation.

(K) A person who violates
 Section 2002 in connection with the production or cultivation of cannabis or cannabis products is subject to a civil penalty of not more than eight thousand dollars ($8,000) for each violation.

(2) Each day that a violation of a code section described in this subdivision occurs or continues to occur shall constitute a separate violation.

(c) The civil penalty imposed for each separate violation pursuant to this section is in addition to any other civil penalty imposed for another violation of this section, or any violation of any other law.

(d) All civil penalties imposed or collected by a court for a separate violation pursuant to this section shall not be considered to be fines or forfeitures, as described in Section 13003, and shall be apportioned in the following manner:

(1) Thirty percent shall be distributed to the county in which the violation was committed pursuant to Section 13003. The county board of supervisors shall first use any revenues from those penalties to reimburse the costs incurred by the district attorney or city attorney in investigating and prosecuting the violation.

(2) Thirty percent shall be distributed to the investigating agency to be used to reimburse the cost of any investigation directly related to the violations described in this section.

(3) (A) Forty percent shall be deposited into the Cannabis-Impacted Lands Restoration Fund, which is hereby created, to fund the remediation and restoration of lands impacted by cannabis cultivation on public or private lands.

(B) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the Cannabis-Impacted Lands Restoration Fund is continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years to the department for the purposes set forth in subparagraph (A).

(e) Civil penalties authorized pursuant to this section may be imposed administratively by the department if all of the following occur:

(1) The chief deputy director or law enforcement division assistant chief in charge of cannabis-related enforcement issues a complaint to any person or entity on which an administrative civil penalty may be imposed pursuant to this section. The complaint shall allege the act or failure to act that constitutes a violation, any facts related to natural resources impacts, the provision of law authorizing the civil penalty to be imposed, and the proposed penalty amount.

(2) The complaint and order is served by personal notice or certified mail and informs the party served that the party may request a hearing not later than 20 days from the date of service. If a hearing is requested, it shall be scheduled before the director or the director’s designee, which designee shall not be the chief deputy or assistant chief issuing the complaint and order. A request for a hearing shall contain a brief statement of the material facts the party claims support their contention that no administrative penalty should be imposed or that an administrative penalty of a lesser amount is warranted. A party served with a complaint pursuant to this subdivision waives their right to a hearing if a hearing is not requested within 20 days of service of the complaint, in which case the order imposing the administrative penalty shall become final.

(3) The director, or the
 director’s designee, shall control the nature and order of hearing proceedings. Hearings shall be informal in nature, and need not be conducted according to the technical rules relating to evidence. The director or the director’s designee shall issue a final order within 45 days of the close of the hearing. A copy of the final order shall be served by certified mail upon the party served with the complaint.

(4) A party may obtain review of the final order by filing a petition for a writ of mandate with the superior court within 30 days of the date of service of the final order. The administrative penalty shall be due and payable to the department within 60 days after the time to seek judicial review has expired, or, where the party did not request a hearing of the order, within 20 days after the order imposing an administrative penalty becomes final.

(5) The department may adopt
 regulations to implement this subdivision.

(f) All administrative penalties imposed or collected by the department for a separate violation pursuant to this section shall not be considered to be fines or forfeitures, as described in Section 13003, and shall be deposited into the Cannabis-Impacted Lands Restoration Fund.

(g) Any civil penalty imposed pursuant to this section for the violation of an offense described in paragraph (4), (5), or (6) of subdivision (a) or subparagraph (D), (E), or (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) for which the person was convicted shall be offset by the amount of any restitution ordered by a criminal court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 839, Sec. 3.   (AB 2643)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

12025.1.

(a) In addition to any penalties imposed by any other law, a person found to have violated Section 5901 shall be liable for a civil penalty of not more than eight thousand dollars ($8,000) for each violation. Each day that a violation of Section 5901 occurs or continues without a good faith effort by the person to cure the violation after receiving notice from the department shall constitute a separate violation.

(b) All civil penalties imposed or collected by a court for a separate violation pursuant to this section in connection with the production or cultivation of a controlled substance shall not be considered to be fines or forfeitures, as described in Section 13003, and shall be apportioned in the manner described in subdivision (d) of
 Section 12025.

(c) All civil penalties imposed or collected by a court for a separate violation pursuant to this section not in connection with the production or cultivation of a controlled substance shall not be considered to be fines or forfeitures, as described in Section 13003, and shall be apportioned in the following manner:

(1) Thirty percent shall be distributed to the county in which the violation was committed pursuant to Section 13003. The county board of supervisors shall first use any revenues from those penalties to reimburse the costs incurred by the district attorney or city attorney in investigating and prosecuting the violation.

(2) (A) Thirty percent shall be distributed to the investigating agency to be used to
 reimburse the cost of any investigation directly related to the violations described in this section.

(B) If the department receives reimbursement pursuant to this paragraph for activities funded pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 4629.6 of the Public Resources Code, the reimbursement funds shall be deposited into the Timber Regulation and Forest Restoration Fund, created by Section 4629.3 of the Public Resources Code, if there is an unpaid balance for a loan authorized by subdivision (f) of Section 4629.6 of the Public Resources Code. 

(3) Forty percent shall be deposited into the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(d) (1) Civil penalties authorized pursuant to
 subdivision (a) may be imposed administratively by the department according to the procedures described in paragraphs (1) through (4), inclusive, of subdivision (e) of Section 12025.

(2) The department shall adopt emergency regulations to implement this subdivision in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption of these regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(e) All administrative penalties imposed or collected by the department for a separate violation pursuant to this section in connection with the production or cultivation of a controlled substance shall not be considered to be fines or forfeitures, as described in Section 13003, and shall be
 deposited according the provisions of subdivision (f) of Section 12025.

(f) All administrative penalties imposed or collected by the department for a separate violation pursuant to this section not in connection with the production or cultivation of a controlled substance shall not be considered to be fines or forfeitures, as described in Section 13003, and shall be deposited into the Timber Regulation and Forest Restoration Fund, created by Section 4629.3 of the Public Resources Code, to repay any unpaid balance of a loan authorized by subdivision (f) of Section 4629.6 of the Public Resources Code. Any remaining funds from administrative penalties collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be apportioned in the following manner:

(1) Fifty percent shall be deposited into the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(2) Fifty percent shall be deposited into the Timber Regulation and Forest Restoration Fund for grants authorized pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 4629.6 of the Public Resources Code.

(g) For purposes of this section, “controlled substance” has the same meaning as defined in Section 11007 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 2, Sec. 2.   (AB 92)   Effective March 27, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

12025.2.

The director or his or her designee may issue a complaint to any person or entity in accordance with Section 1055 of the Water Code alleging a violation for which liability may be imposed under Section 1052 or 1847 of the Water Code that harms fish and wildlife resources. The complaint is subject to the substantive and procedural requirements set forth in Section 1055 of the Water Code, and the department shall be designated a party to any proceeding before the State Water Resources Control Board regarding a complaint filed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 32, Sec. 60.   (SB 837)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12026.

Any person whom the department determines has provided evidence or information leading to the arrest and conviction of a person or persons found guilty of violating Section 6400 through the use of an aquatic nuisance species, is eligible to obtain a reward of up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) pursuant to Section 2586.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 431, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

12028.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(a) Poaching violations and other violations of the Fish and Game Code have been increasing, and these violations have a detrimental impact on fish and wildlife and their habitats, which are held in trust by the state for the benefit of the people of the state.

(b) In order to deter illegal poaching and other violations that adversely impact fish and wildlife, it is important that the department coordinate with other law enforcement entities and the courts to facilitate effective enforcement and prosecution of these offenses.

(c) The department, to the extent feasible and subject to available resources, shall establish and coordinate an environmental crimes task force. The task force should involve the participation of the department’s Office of General Counsel working with each of the department’s law enforcement districts. The task force may include coordination with representatives from the California District Attorneys’ Association, the Judicial Council, the Attorney General’s office, and the University of California. Objectives of the task force may include, but are not limited to, providing training, education, and outreach to prosecutors and the courts on Fish and Game Code violations and providing other assistance as appropriate in the prosecution of environmental crimes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 559, Sec. 25.   (AB 2402)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12029.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The environmental impacts associated with cannabis cultivation have increased, and unlawful water diversions for cannabis irrigation have a detrimental effect on fish and wildlife and their habitat, which are held in trust by the state for the benefit of the people of the state.

(2) The remediation of existing cannabis cultivation sites is often complex and the permitting of these sites requires greater department staff time and personnel expenditures. The potential for cannabis cultivation sites to significantly impact the state’s fish and wildlife resources requires immediate action on the part of the department’s lake and streambed
 alteration permitting staff.

(b) In order to address unlawful water diversions and other violations of the Fish and Game Code associated with cannabis cultivation, the department shall establish the watershed enforcement program to facilitate the investigation, enforcement, and prosecution of these offenses.

(c) The department, in coordination with the State Water Resources Control Board and the Department of Cannabis Control, shall establish a permanent multiagency task force to address the environmental impacts of cannabis cultivation. The multiagency task force, to the extent feasible and subject to available resources, shall expand its enforcement efforts on a statewide level to ensure the reduction of adverse impacts of cannabis cultivation on fish and wildlife and their habitats throughout the state.

(d) In order to facilitate the remediation and permitting of cannabis cultivation sites, the department may adopt regulations to enhance the fees on any entity subject to Section 1602 for cannabis cultivation sites that require remediation. The fee schedule established pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed the fee limits in Section
 1609.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 99.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Forfeitures, Revocation, and Seizures [12150. - 12166.]

12150.

Whenever any person, while taking a bird or mammal, kills or wounds any human being and that fact is ascertained by the department, the department shall notify the district attorney of the county in which the act occurred. The district attorney may thereupon bring an action in the superior court of the county in which the act occurred for the purpose of determining the cause of the killing or the wounding. These proceedings shall be conducted in the same manner as an action to try a misdemeanor and the defendant may request that all findings of fact shall be made by a jury. The court shall inform the defendant of the nature of the proceedings and of the defendant’s right to have a jury.

If it is found that the defendant did the killing or wounding, but that it was not intentional or negligent, the court shall dismiss the proceeding. Otherwise, if it is found that the defendant did the killing or wounding intentionally, by an act of gross negligence, or while under the influence of alcohol, the court shall issue an order permanently prohibiting the defendant from taking any bird or mammal.

If it is found that the defendant was negligent, but not grossly negligent, the court shall issue an order prohibiting the defendant from taking any bird or mammal for a period specified at the discretion of the court but not less than five years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 449, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12150.5.

Any person whose license has heretofore been revoked pursuant to Section 12150 may, upon petition, obtain a new trial in the court which originally revoked his license. Such trial shall be with a jury if requested as provided in Section 12150, and shall be to determine if the revocation was based on an intentional or grossly negligent act or an act committed while under the influence of alcohol, in which case the petition shall be denied. If however, it was based on a negligent act not amounting to gross negligence the court may review and redetermine the length of time for which no license should be issued such person. The court may authorize the issuance of a license to the person after such time as the court shall determine to be proper in light of the circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2210.)
-------------------------------------------

12150.6.

(a) Any person who has been prohibited from taking any bird or mammal pursuant to Section 12150 or 12151 shall not apply for a hunting license or take any bird or mammal unless the person has filed with the department proof of ability to respond in damages in an amount of at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for personal injury or death of any person, subject to a maximum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for such injury or the death of two or more persons in any one accident and at least five thousand dollars ($5,000) for property damage resulting from any one accident.

(b) Proof of ability to respond in damages may be given by any of the following:
